Utah statutes.
32A-6-101 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Commission's power to issue permits --
Limitations.
(1)  The commission may issue a special use permit for the purchase, storage,
sale, use, consumption, or manufacture of alcoholic products for limited
purposes specified by this chapter and the rules of the commission. The permit
entitles the permittee to purchase, store, sell, use, consume, or manufacture
alcoholic products only in quantities and types and for purposes as stated in
the permit.
(2)  The commission may prescribe by policy, directive, or rule consistent
with this title, the general operational requirements of permittees relating
to:
(a)  physical facilities;
(b)  conditions of purchase, sale, storage, use, consumption, or manufacture
of alcoholic beverages;
(c)  purchase, storage, and sales quantity limitations; and
(d)  other matters considered appropriate by the commission.
